Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-703
Department of Correctional Services adult correctional facility; location.

A Department of Correctional Services adult correctional facility of the state shall be located upon a reservation in the city of Lincoln or upon lands belonging to the state and adjacent to the city of Lincoln.

Laws 1867, § 12, p. 55;

R.S.1913, § 5887;

C.S.1922, § 5250;

C.S.1929, § 72-703;

R.S.1943, § 72-703;

Laws 1993, LB 31, § 21.

For provisions relating to the Department of Correctional Services adult correctional facility, see Chapter 83, article 4.